Georgia, session 2025_26, SB263.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Code Section 20-8-5 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to law enforcement
powers of school security personnel in each public school system of the state, certification,
and carrying of firearms or weapons, is amended by revising subsections (a) and (c) as
follows:
"(a) In each public local school system in this state, school security personnel employed
by the local board of education of a county or an independent board of education of a
municipality for the various public schools thereof who are certified pursuant to
subsection (b) of this Code section and who are authorized by the such local board of
S. B. 263
- 1 -

LC 57 0239
education of that county or the independent board of education of that municipality shall
have the same law enforcement powers on school property and on public or private
property within five miles of school property, including the power of arrest, as law
enforcement officers of that respective the county or municipality in which the local school
system is located."
"(c) The provisions of this Code section shall not prohibit a local board of education of a
county or an independent board of education of a municipality from employing school
security personnel without law enforcement powers."
SECTION 2.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
S. B. 263
- 2 -